Missouri, session 2026, HB2450.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.2540, 67.2552, 99.103, 188.028, 191.656, 191.668, 210.110,
210.118, 210.145, 210.156, 226.531, 513.605, 545.940, 566.103, 566.223, 567.010, 567.020,
567.030, 567.050, 567.060, 567.070, 567.080, 567.085, 567.087, 567.089, 567.090, 567.100,
567.110, 567.120, 573.503, 573.525, 573.531, 577.675, 578.421, 589.400, 589.414, 595.120,
and 610.131, RSMo, are repealed and twenty-seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
known as sections 67.2540, 67.2552, 99.103, 188.028, 191.656, 191.668, 210.110, 210.118,
210.145, 210.156, 226.531, 513.605, 545.940, 566.103, 566.223, 567.010, 567.016, 567.080,
573.503, 573.525, 573.531, 577.675, 578.421, 589.400, 589.414, 595.120, and 610.131, to
read as follows:
67.2540. As used in sections 67.2540 to 67.2556, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar establishment in which
persons regularly appear in a state of nudity, as defined in section 573.500, or seminudity in
the performance of their duties;
(2) "Employee", a person who is at least twenty-one years of age and who performs
any service on the premises of a sexually oriented business on a full-time, part-time, or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2450 2
contract basis, whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent
contractor, agent, or otherwise, and whether or not said person is paid a salary, wage, or other
compensation by the operator of said business. The term employee does not include a person
exclusively on the premises for repair or maintenance of the premises or equipment on the
premises, or for the delivery of goods to the premises;
(3) "Nudity" or a "state of nudity", the showing of the human male or female genitals,
pubic area, vulva, anus, anal cleft or anal cleavage with less than a fully opaque covering, the
showing of the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any part of the nipple,
or the showing of the covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state;
(4) "Nuisance", any place in or upon which lewdness, assignation, or [prostitution]
commercial sexual exploitation is conducted, permitted, continued, or exists, or any place,
in or upon which lewd, indecent, lascivious, or obscene films, or films designed to be
projected for exhibition, are photographed, manufactured, developed, screened, exhibited, or
otherwise prepared or shown, and the personal property and contents used in conducting and
maintaining any such place for any such purpose. The provisions of this section shall not
affect any newspaper, magazine, or other publication entered as second class matter by the
post office department;
(5) "Person", an individual, proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, or
other legal entity;
(6) "Seminude" or in a "seminude condition", a state of dress in which opaque
clothing fails to cover the genitals, anus, anal cleft or cleavage, pubic area, vulva, nipple and
areola of the female breast below a horizontal line across the top of the areola at its highest
point. Seminudity shall include the entire lower portion of the female breast, but shall not
include any portion of the cleavage of the human female breast exhibited by wearing apparel
provided the areola is not exposed in whole or part;
(7) "Sexually oriented business", an adult cabaret or any business which offers its
patrons goods of which a substantial or significant portion are sexually oriented material. It
shall be presumed that a business that derives thirty percent or less of its revenue from
sexually oriented materials is presumed not to be a sexually oriented business. No building,
premises, structure, or other facility that contains any sexually oriented business shall contain
any other kind of sexually oriented business;
(8) "Sexually oriented materials", any pictorial or three-dimensional material, or film,
motion picture, DVD, video cassette, or similar photographic reproduction, that depicts
nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse, as defined in section
573.010;
(9) "Specified criminal activity" includes the following offenses:

HB 2450 3
(a) Prostitution or promotion of prostitution as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
commercial sexual exploitation; dissemination of obscenity; sale, distribution, or display of
harmful material to a minor; sexual performance by a child; possession or distribution of child
pornography; public lewdness; indecent exposure; indecency with a child; engaging in
organized criminal activity; sexual assault; molestation of a child; gambling prohibited under
Missouri law; or distribution of a controlled substance; or any similar offenses described in
this subdivision under the criminal or penal code of other states or countries;
(b) For which:
a. Less than two years have elapsed since the date of conviction or the date of release
from confinement imposed for the conviction, whichever is the later date, if the conviction is
of a misdemeanor offense;
b. Less than five years have elapsed since the date of conviction or the date of release
from confinement for the conviction, whichever is the later date, if the conviction is of a
felony offense; or
c. Less than five years have elapsed since the date of the last conviction or the date of
release from confinement for the last conviction, whichever is the later date, if the convictions
are of two or more misdemeanor offenses or combination of misdemeanor offenses occurring
within any twenty-four-month period;
(c) The fact that a conviction is being appealed shall not prevent a sexually oriented
business from being considered a nuisance and closed under section 67.2546;
(10) "Specified sexual activities" includes the following acts:
(a) The fondling or other erotic touching of human genitals, pubic region, buttocks,
anus, or female breasts;
(b) Sex acts, actual or simulated, including intercourse, oral copulation, masturbation,
or sodomy; or
(c) Excretory functions as part of or in connection with any of the activities set forth
in this subdivision.
67.2552. 1. It shall be a class A misdemeanor for a person, in a sexually oriented
business, to knowingly and intentionally appear in a state of nudity or depict, simulate, or
perform specified sexual activities.
2. It shall be a class A misdemeanor for a person to appear knowingly or intentionally
in a sexually oriented business in a seminude condition unless the person is an employee who,
while seminude, shall be at least ten feet from any patron or customer and on a stage at least
two feet from the floor and behind a railing no less than twenty-four inches in height.
3. It shall be a class A misdemeanor for an employee, while seminude, to touch a
customer or the clothing of a customer.

HB 2450 4
4. It shall be a class A misdemeanor if a person knowingly allows on the premises of
a sexually oriented business a person under the age of twenty-one years, except for a person
exclusively on the premises for repair or maintenance of the premises or equipment on the
premises, or for the delivery of goods to the premises.
5. The provisions of sections 67.2540 to 67.2552 are designed to protect the
following public policy interest of this state, including but not limited to: to mitigate the
adverse secondary effects of sexually oriented businesses, to limit harm to minors, and to
reduce [prostitution] commercial sexual exploitation, crime, juvenile delinquency,
deterioration in property values and lethargy in neighborhood improvement efforts.
99.103. 1. In addition to the duties imposed by section 99.100, no housing authority
in any city with a population of four hundred thousand or more inhabitants, and whose
jurisdiction covers more than one county, shall rent or lease accommodations to any person
who, within the preceding five years, has been convicted of [a crime] an offense involving
prostitution as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, commercial sexual exploitation, or the
possession or sale of controlled substances listed in schedule I and II of section 195.017, or
whose dwelling unit is known to have been the site of [crimes] offensesinvolving prostitution
as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, commercial sexual exploitation,or the possession or
sale of controlled substances listed in schedule I and II of section 195.017.
2. If a family which is living in accommodations rented or leased by the housing
authority becomes ineligible for such accommodations because a member of that family was
convicted of a crime listed in subsection 1 of this section, the remaining members of such
family may reapply to the board of commissioners of the housing authority for
accommodations.
188.028. 1. Except in the case of a medical emergency, no person shall knowingly
perform or induce an abortion upon a pregnant woman under the age of eighteen years unless:
(1) The attending physician has secured the informed written consent of the minor
and one parent or guardian, and the consenting parent or guardian of the minor has notified
any other custodial parent in writing prior to the securing of the informed written consent of
the minor and one parent or guardian. For purposes of this subdivision, "custodial parent"
shall only mean a parent of a minor who has been awarded joint legal custody or joint
physical custody of such minor by a court of competent jurisdiction. Notice shall not be
required for any parent:
(a) Who has been found guilty of any offense in violation of chapter 565, relating to
offenses against the person; chapter 566, relating to sexual offenses; chapter 567, relating to
prostitution as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or commercial sexual exploitation;
chapter 568, relating to offenses against the family; or chapter 573, related to pornography
and related offenses, if a child was a victim;

HB 2450 5
(b) Who has been found guilty of any offense in any other state or foreign country, or
under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction if a child was a victim, which would be a
violation of chapters 565, 566, 567, 568, or 573 if committed in this state;
(c) Who is listed on the sexual offender registry under sections 589.400 to 589.425;
(d) Against whom an order of protection has been issued, including a foreign order of
protection given full faith and credit in this state under section 455.067;
(e) Whose custodial, parental, or guardianship rights have been terminated by a court
of competent jurisdiction; or
(f) Whose whereabouts are unknown after reasonable inquiry, who is a fugitive from
justice, who is habitually in an intoxicated or drugged condition, or who has been declared
mentally incompetent or incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(2) The minor is emancipated and the attending physician has received the informed
written consent of the minor;
(3) The minor has been granted the right to self-consent to the abortion by court order
pursuant to subsection 2 of this section, and the attending physician has received the informed
written consent of the minor; or
(4) The minor has been granted consent to the abortion by court order, and the court
has given its informed written consent in accordance with subsection 2 of this section, and the
minor is having the abortion willingly, in compliance with subsection 3 of this section.
2. The right of a minor to self-consent to an abortion under subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of this section or court consent under subdivision (4) of subsection 1 of this
section may be granted by a court pursuant to the following procedures:
(1) The minor or next friend shall make an application to the juvenile court which
shall assist the minor or next friend in preparing the petition and notices required pursuant to
this section. The minor or the next friend of the minor shall thereafter file a petition setting
forth the initials of the minor; the age of the minor; the names and addresses of each parent,
guardian, or, if the minor's parents are deceased and no guardian has been appointed, any
other person standing in loco parentis of the minor; that the minor has been fully informed of
the risks and consequences of the abortion; that the minor is of sound mind and has sufficient
intellectual capacity to consent to the abortion; that, if the court does not grant the minor
majority rights for the purpose of consent to the abortion, the court should find that the
abortion is in the best interest of the minor and give judicial consent to the abortion; that the
court should appoint a guardian ad litem of the child; and if the minor does not have private
counsel, that the court should appoint counsel. The petition shall be signed by the minor or
the next friend;
(2) A hearing on the merits of the petition, to be held on the record, shall be held as
soon as possible within five days of the filing of the petition. If any party is unable to afford

HB 2450 6
counsel, the court shall appoint counsel at least twenty-four hours before the time of the
hearing. At the hearing, the court shall hear evidence relating to the emotional development,
maturity, intellect and understanding of the minor; the nature, possible consequences, and
alternatives to the abortion; and any other evidence that the court may find useful in
determining whether the minor should be granted majority rights for the purpose of
consenting to the abortion or whether the abortion is in the best interests of the minor;
(3) In the decree, the court shall for good cause:
(a) Grant the petition for majority rights for the purpose of consenting to the abortion;
(b) Find the abortion to be in the best interests of the minor and give judicial consent
to the abortion, setting forth the grounds for so finding; or
(c) Deny the petition, setting forth the grounds on which the petition is denied;
(4) If the petition is allowed, the informed consent of the minor, pursuant to a court
grant of majority rights, or the judicial consent, shall bar an action by the parents or guardian
of the minor on the grounds of battery of the minor by those performing or inducing the
abortion. The immunity granted shall only extend to the performance or induction of the
abortion in accordance herewith and any necessary accompanying services which are
performed in a competent manner. The costs of the action shall be borne by the parties;
(5) An appeal from an order issued under the provisions of this section may be taken
to the court of appeals of this state by the minor or by a parent or guardian of the minor. The
notice of intent to appeal shall be given within twenty-four hours from the date of issuance of
the order. The record on appeal shall be completed and the appeal shall be perfected within
five days from the filing of notice to appeal. Because time may be of the essence regarding
the performance or induction of the abortion, the supreme court of this state shall, by court
rule, provide for expedited appellate review of cases appealed under this section.
3. If a minor desires an abortion, then she shall be orally informed of and, if possible,
sign the written consent required under this chapter in the same manner as an adult person.
No abortion shall be performed or induced on any minor against her will, except that an
abortion may be performed or induced against the will of a minor pursuant to a court order
described in subdivision (4) of subsection 1 of this section that the abortion is necessary to
preserve the life of the minor.
191.656. 1. (1) All information known to, and records containing any information
held or maintained by, any person, or by any agency, department, or political subdivision of
the state concerning an individual's HIV infection status or the results of any individual's HIV
testing shall be strictly confidential and shall not be disclosed except to:
(a) Public employees within the agency, department, or political subdivision who
need to know to perform their public duties;

HB 2450 7
(b) Public employees of other agencies, departments, or political subdivisions who
need to know to perform their public duties;
(c) Peace officers, as defined in section 590.100, the attorney general or any assistant
attorneys general acting on his or her behalf, as defined in chapter 27, and prosecuting
attorneys or circuit attorneys as defined in chapter 56 and pursuant to section 191.657;
(d) Prosecuting attorneys or circuit attorneys as defined in chapter 56 to prosecute
cases pursuant to section 191.677 or 567.020 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026.
Prosecuting attorneys or circuit attorneys may obtain from the department of health and
senior services the contact information and test results of individuals with whom the HIV-
infected individual has had sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse. Any prosecuting
attorney or circuit attorney who receives information from the department of health and
senior services pursuant to the provisions of this section shall use such information only for
investigative and prosecutorial purposes and such information shall be considered strictly
confidential and shall only be released as authorized by this section;
(e) Persons other than public employees who are entrusted with the regular care of
those under the care and custody of a state agency, including but not limited to operators of
day care facilities, group homes, residential care facilities and adoptive or foster parents;
(f) As authorized by subsection 2 of this section;
(g) Victims of any sexual offense defined in chapter 566, which includes sexual
intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse, as an element of the crime or to a victim of a section
545.940 offense, in which the court, for good cause shown, orders the defendant to be tested
for HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, syphilis, gonorrhea, or chlamydia, once the charge is filed.
Prosecuting attorneys or circuit attorneys, or the department of health and senior services may
release information to such victims;
(h) Any individual who has tested positive or false positive to HIV, hepatitis B,
hepatitis C, syphilis, gonorrhea, or chlamydia, may request copies of any and all test results
relating to said infections.
(2) Further disclosure by public employees shall be governed by subsections 2 and 3
of this section;
(3) Disclosure by a public employee or any other person in violation of this section
may be subject to civil actions brought under subsection 6 of this section, unless otherwise
required by chapter 330, 332, 334, or 335, pursuant to discipline taken by a state licensing
board.
2. (1) Unless the person acted in bad faith or with conscious disregard, no person
shall be liable for violating any duty or right of confidentiality established by law for
disclosing the results of an individual's HIV testing:
(a) To the department of health and senior services;

HB 2450 8
(b) To health care personnel working directly with the infected individual who have a
reasonable need to know the results for the purpose of providing direct patient health care;
(c) Pursuant to the written authorization of the subject of the test result or results;
(d) To the spouse of the subject of the test result or results;
(e) To the subject of the test result or results;
(f) To the parent or legal guardian or custodian of the subject of the testing, if he is an
unemancipated minor;
(g) To the victim of any sexual offense defined in chapter 566, which includes sexual
intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse, as an element of the crime or to a victim of a section
545.940 offense, in which the court, for good cause shown, orders the defendant to be tested
for HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, syphilis, gonorrhea, or chlamydia, once the charge is filed;
(h) To employees of a state licensing board in the execution of their duties under
chapter 330, 332, 334, or 335 pursuant to discipline taken by a state licensing board;

The department of health and senior services and its employees shall not be held liable for
disclosing an HIV-infected person's HIV status to individuals with whom that person had
sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse;
(2) Paragraphs (b) and (d) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not be construed
in any court to impose any duty on a person to disclose the results of an individual's HIV
testing to a spouse or health care professional or other potentially exposed person, parent or
guardian;
(3) No person to whom the results of an individual's HIV testing has been disclosed
pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (c) of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall further disclose
such results; except that prosecuting attorneys or circuit attorneys may disclose such
information to defense attorneys defending actions pursuant to section 191.677 or 567.020 as
it existed prior to August 28, 2026, under the rules of discovery, or jurors or court personnel
hearing cases pursuant to section 191.677 or 567.020 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026.
Such information shall not be used or disclosed for any other purpose;
(4) When the results of HIV testing, disclosed pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subdivision (1) of this subsection, are included in the medical record of the patient who is
subject to the test, the inclusion is not a disclosure for purposes of such paragraph so long as
such medical record is afforded the same confidentiality protection afforded other medical
records.
3. All communications between the subject of HIV testing and a physician, hospital,
or other person authorized by the department of health and senior services who performs or
conducts HIV sampling shall be privileged communications.

HB 2450 9
4. The identity of any individual participating in a research project approved by an
institutional review board shall not be reported to the department of health and senior services
by the physician conducting the research project.
5. The subject of HIV testing who is found to have HIV infection and is aware of his
or her HIV status shall disclose such information to any health care professional from whom
such person receives health care services. Said notification shall be made prior to receiving
services from such health care professional if the HIV-infected person is medically capable of
conveying that information or as soon as he or she becomes capable of conveying that
information.
6. Any individual aggrieved by a violation of this section or regulations promulgated
by the department of health and senior services may bring a civil action for damages. If it is
found in a civil action that:
(1) A person has negligently violated this section, the person is liable, for each
violation, for:
(a) The greater of actual damages or liquidated damages of one thousand dollars; and
(b) Court costs and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the person bringing the
action; and
(c) Such other relief, including injunctive relief, as the court may deem appropriate;
or
(2) A person has willfully or intentionally or recklessly violated this section, the
100 person is liable, for each violation, for:
101 (a) The greater of actual damages or liquidated damages of five thousand dollars; and
102 (b) Exemplary damages; and
103 (c) Court costs and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the person bringing the
104 action; and
105 (d) Such other relief, including injunctive relief, as the court may deem appropriate.
106 7. No civil liability shall accrue to any health care provider as a result of making a
107 good faith report to the department of health and senior services about a person reasonably
108 believed to be infected with HIV, or cooperating in good faith with the department in an
109 investigation determining whether a court order directing an individual to undergo HIV
110 testing will be sought, or in participating in good faith in any judicial proceeding resulting
111 from such a report or investigations; and any person making such a report, or cooperating
112 with such an investigation or participating in such a judicial proceeding, shall be immune
113 from civil liability as a result of such actions so long as taken in good faith.
191.668. 1. The department of health and senior services shall prepare public
education and awareness plans and programs for the general public, and the department of
elementary and secondary education shall prepare educational programs for public schools,

HB 2450 10
regarding means of transmission and prevention and treatment of the HIV virus. The plans
and programs shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Medically correct, age specific, transmission and prevention programs for use at
the discretion of the public schools beginning with students at the sixth grade level. The
educational programs shall stress moral responsibility in and restraint from sexual activity
and avoidance of controlled substance use whereby HIV can be transmitted;
(2) Risk reduction programs for specific populations at high risk of HIV infection;
(3) Educational programs on transmission and prevention of HIV infection in the
workplace for use by employers;
(4) Personal protection procedures for use by health care providers and others in close
contact with potentially infected individuals;
(5) General public information programs and circulars containing factual information
that will allow the public at large to assess its risk and develop informed individual judgment
and behavior. The department shall prepare for free distribution among the residents of the
state printed information concerning the means of transmission of the HIV virus, the dangers
from HIV infection, means of prevention, and the necessity for testing; and
(6) Develop presentations for community service and school organizations describing
the medical and psychosocial aspects of HIV infection, including information on how
infection is transmitted and can be prevented.
2. None of the plans, programs or printed information prepared or provided under this
section shall promote behavior that is an offense in violation of chapter 566 concerning sexual
offenses; is an offense involving the use of a controlled substance as defined in chapter 195; is
an offense in violation of section 568.020 concerning incest; or is an offense in violation of
any city, county or state law prohibiting prostitution or patronizing prostitution as it existed
prior to August 28, 2026, or commercial sexual exploitation.
210.110. As used in sections 210.109 to 210.165, and sections 210.180 to 210.183,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Abuse", any physical injury, sexual abuse, or emotional abuse inflicted on a child
other than by accidental means by those responsible for the child's care, custody, and control,
except that discipline including spanking, administered in a reasonable manner, shall not be
construed to be abuse. Victims of abuse shall also include any victims of sex trafficking or
severe forms of trafficking as those terms are defined in 22 U.S.C. Section 7102, as amended;
(2) "Assessment and treatment services for children", an approach to be developed by
the children's division which will recognize and treat the specific needs of at-risk and abused
or neglected children. The developmental and medical assessment may be a broad physical,
developmental, and mental health screening to be completed within thirty days of a child's
entry into custody and in accordance with the periodicity schedule set forth by the American

HB 2450 11
Academy of Pediatrics thereafter as long as the child remains in care. Screenings may be
offered at a centralized location and include, at a minimum, the following:
(a) Complete physical to be performed by a pediatrician familiar with the effects of
abuse and neglect on young children;
(b) Developmental, behavioral, and emotional screening in addition to early periodic
screening, diagnosis, and treatment services, including a core set of standardized and
recognized instruments as well as interviews with the child and appropriate caregivers. The
screening battery may be performed by a licensed mental health professional familiar with the
effects of abuse and neglect on young children, who will then serve as the liaison between all
service providers in ensuring that needed services are provided. Such treatment services may
include in-home services, out-of-home placement, intensive twenty-four-hour treatment
services, family counseling, parenting training and other best practices.

Children whose screenings indicate an area of concern may complete a comprehensive, in-
depth health, psychodiagnostic, or developmental assessment within sixty days of entry into
custody;
(3) "Central registry", a registry of persons where the division has found probable
cause to believe prior to August 28, 2004, or by a preponderance of the evidence after August
28, 2004, or a court has substantiated through court adjudication that the individual has
committed child abuse or neglect or the person has pled guilty or has been found guilty of a
crime pursuant to section 565.020, 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.050, 566.030, 566.060,
[or] 567.050 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, if the victim is a child less than eighteen
years of age, or 567.016 if the victim is a child less than eighteen years of age,or any other
crime pursuant to chapter 566 if the victim is a child less than eighteen years of age and the
perpetrator is twenty-one years of age or older, a crime under section 568.020, 568.030,
568.045, 568.050, 568.060, 568.080, 568.090, 573.023, 573.025, 573.035, 573.037, 573.040,
573.200, or 573.205, or an attempt to commit any such crimes. Any persons placed on the
registry prior to August 28, 2004, shall remain on the registry for the duration of time
required by section 210.152;
(4) "Child", any person, regardless of physical or mental condition, under eighteen
years of age;
(5) "Children's services providers and agencies", any public, quasi-public, or private
entity with the appropriate and relevant training and expertise in delivering services to
children and their families as determined by the children's division, and capable of providing
direct services and other family services for children in the custody of the children's division
or any such entities or agencies that are receiving state moneys for such services;

HB 2450 12
(6) "Director", the director of the Missouri children's division within the department
of social services;
(7) "Division", the Missouri children's division within the department of social
services;
(8) "Family assessment and services", an approach to be developed by the children's
division which will provide for a prompt assessment of a child who has been reported to the
division as a victim of abuse or neglect by a person responsible for that child's care, custody
or control and of that child's family, including risk of abuse and neglect and, if necessary, the
provision of community-based services to reduce the risk and support the family;
(9) "Family support team meeting" or "team meeting", a meeting convened by the
division or children's services provider in behalf of the family and/or child for the purpose of
determining service and treatment needs, determining the need for placement and developing
a plan for reunification or other permanency options, determining the appropriate placement
of the child, evaluating case progress, and establishing and revising the case plan;
(10) "Investigation", the collection of physical and verbal evidence to determine if a
child has been abused or neglected;
(11) "Jail or detention center personnel", employees and volunteers working in any
premises or institution where incarceration, evaluation, care, treatment or rehabilitation is
provided to persons who are being held under custody of the law;
(12) "Neglect", failure to provide, by those responsible for the care, custody, and
control of the child, the proper or necessary support, education as required by law, nutrition or
medical, surgical, or any other care necessary for the child's well-being, except that neglect
shall not be found by virtue of the sole fact that a person allows a child to engage in
independent activities without adult supervision including, but not limited to, traveling to or
from school or nearby locations by bicycle or on foot, playing outdoors, or remaining at home
for a reasonable period of time, provided such activities are appropriate based on the child's
age, maturity, and physical and mental abilities, and the lack of adult supervision does not
constitute conduct that is so grossly negligent as to endanger the health or safety of the child.
Victims of neglect shall also include any victims of sex trafficking or severe forms of
trafficking as those terms are defined in 22 U.S.C. Section 7102, as amended;
(13) "Preponderance of the evidence", that degree of evidence that is of greater
weight or more convincing than the evidence which is offered in opposition to it or evidence
which as a whole shows the fact to be proved to be more probable than not;
(14) "Probable cause", available facts when viewed in the light of surrounding
circumstances which would cause a reasonable person to believe a child was abused or
neglected;

HB 2450 13
(15) "Report", the communication of an allegation of child abuse or neglect to the
division pursuant to section 210.115;
(16) "Those responsible for the care, custody, and control of the child", includes, but
is not limited to:
(a) The parents or legal guardians of a child;
(b) Other members of the child's household;
(c) Those exercising supervision over a child for any part of a twenty-four-hour day;
(d) Any adult person who has access to the child based on relationship to the parents
of the child or members of the child's household or the family;
(e) Any person who takes control of the child by deception, force, or coercion; or
(f) School personnel, contractors, and volunteers, if the relationship with the child
was established through the school or through school-related activities, even if the alleged
abuse or neglect occurred outside of school hours or off school grounds.
210.118. 1. Except for actions under the uniform parentage act, sections 210.817 to
210.852, in any action under chapter 210 or 211 in which the court finds by a preponderance
of the evidence that a party is responsible for child abuse or neglect, as those terms are
defined in section 210.110, the clerk shall send a certified copy of the judgment or order to the
children's division and to the appropriate prosecuting attorney. Upon receipt of the order, the
children's division shall list the individual as a perpetrator of child abuse or neglect in the
central registry.
2. In every case in which the person has pled guilty to or been found guilty of:
(1) A crime under section 565.020, 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, 565.050, 566.030,
566.060, [or] 567.050 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or 567.016 and the victim is a
child under eighteen years of age;
(2) Any other crime in chapter 566 if the victim is a child under eighteen years of age
and the perpetrator is twenty-one years of age or older;
(3) A crime under section 568.020, 568.030, 568.045, 568.050, 568.060, 568.080,
568.090, 573.023, 573.025, 573.035, 573.037, 573.040, 573.200, or 573.205; or
(4) An attempt to commit any such crimes;

the court shall enter an order directing the children's division to list the individual as a
perpetrator of child abuse or neglect in the central registry. The clerk shall send a certified
copy of the order to the children's division. Upon receipt of the order, the children's division
shall list the individual as a perpetrator of child abuse or neglect in the central registry.
210.145. 1. The division shall develop protocols which give priority to:
(1) Ensuring the well-being and safety of the child in instances where child abuse or
neglect has been alleged;

HB 2450 14
(2) Promoting the preservation and reunification of children and families consistent
with state and federal law;
(3) Providing due process for those accused of child abuse or neglect; and
(4) Maintaining an information system operating at all times, capable of receiving and
maintaining reports. This information system shall have the ability to receive reports over a
single, statewide toll-free number. Such information system shall maintain the results of all
investigations, family assessments and services, and other relevant information.
2. (1) The division shall utilize structured decision-making protocols, including a
standard risk assessment that shall be completed within seventy-two hours of the report of
abuse or neglect, for classification purposes of all child abuse and neglect reports. The
protocols developed by the division shall give priority to ensuring the well-being and safety
of the child. All child abuse and neglect reports shall be initiated within twenty-four hours
and shall be classified based upon the reported risk and injury to the child. The division shall
promulgate rules regarding the structured decision-making protocols to be utilized for all
child abuse and neglect reports.
(2) The director of the division and the office of state courts administrator shall
develop a joint safety assessment tool before December 31, 2020, and such tool shall be
implemented before January 1, 2022. The safety assessment tool shall replace the standard
risk assessment required under subdivision (1) of this subsection and shall also be completed
within seventy-two hours of the report of abuse or neglect.
3. Upon receipt of a report, the division shall determine if the report merits
investigation, including reports which if true would constitute a suspected violation of any of
the following: section 565.020, 565.021, 565.023, 565.024, or 565.050 if the victim is a child
less than eighteen years of age, section 566.030 or 566.060 if the victim is a child less than
eighteen years of age, or other crimes under chapter 566 if the victim is a child less than
eighteen years of age and the perpetrator is twenty-one years of age or older, section 567.050
as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, if the victim is a child less than eighteen years of age,
section 567.016 if the victim is a child less than eighteen years of age, section 568.020,
568.030, 568.045, 568.050, 568.060, 573.200, or 573.205, section 573.025, 573.035, 573.037,
or 573.040, or an attempt to commit any such crimes. The division shall immediately
communicate all reports that merit investigation to its appropriate local office and any
relevant information as may be contained in the information system. The local division staff
shall determine, through the use of protocols developed by the division, whether an
investigation or the family assessment and services approach should be used to respond to the
allegation. The protocols developed by the division shall give priority to ensuring the well-
being and safety of the child.

HB 2450 15
4. The division may accept a report for investigation or family assessment if either the
child or alleged perpetrator resides in Missouri, may be found in Missouri, or if the incident
occurred in Missouri.
5. If the division receives a report in which neither the child nor the alleged
perpetrator resides in Missouri or may be found in Missouri and the incident did not occur in
Missouri, the division shall document the report and communicate it to the appropriate agency
or agencies in the state where the child is believed to be located, along with any relevant
information or records as may be contained in the division's information system.
6. When the child abuse and neglect hotline receives three or more calls, within a
seventy-two hour period, from one or more individuals concerning the same child, the
division shall conduct a review to determine whether the calls meet the criteria and statutory
definition for a child abuse and neglect report to be accepted. In conducting the review, the
division shall contact the hotline caller or callers in order to collect information to determine
whether the calls meet the criteria for harassment.
7. The local office shall contact the appropriate law enforcement agency immediately
upon receipt of a report which division personnel determine merits an investigation and
provide such agency with a detailed description of the report received. In such cases the local
division office shall request the assistance of the local law enforcement agency in all aspects
of the investigation of the complaint. The appropriate law enforcement agency shall either
assist the division in the investigation or provide the division, within twenty-four hours, an
explanation in writing detailing the reasons why it is unable to assist.
8. (1) The local office of the division shall cause an investigation or family
assessment and services approach to be initiated in accordance with the protocols established
in subsection 2 of this section, except in cases where the sole basis for the report is
educational neglect. If the report indicates that educational neglect is the only complaint and
there is no suspicion of other neglect or abuse, the investigation shall be initiated within
seventy-two hours of receipt of the report. If the report indicates the child is in danger of
serious physical harm or threat to life, an investigation shall include direct observation of the
subject child within twenty-four hours of the receipt of the report. Local law enforcement
shall take all necessary steps to facilitate such direct observation. Callers to the child abuse
and neglect hotline shall be instructed by the division's hotline to call 911 in instances where
the child may be in immediate danger. If the parents of the child are not the alleged
perpetrators, a parent of the child must be notified prior to the child being interviewed by the
division. No person responding to or investigating a child abuse and neglect report shall call
prior to a home visit or leave any documentation of any attempted visit, such as business
cards, pamphlets, or other similar identifying information if he or she has a reasonable basis
to believe the following factors are present:

HB 2450 16
(a) a. No person is present in the home at the time of the home visit; and
b. The alleged perpetrator resides in the home or the physical safety of the child may
be compromised if the alleged perpetrator becomes aware of the attempted visit;
(b) The alleged perpetrator will be alerted regarding the attempted visit; or
(c) The family has a history of domestic violence or fleeing the community.
(2) If the division is responding to an investigation of abuse or neglect, the person
responding shall first ensure safety of the child through direct observation and
communication with the child. If the parent or alleged perpetrator is present during a visit
by the person responding to or investigating the report, such person shall present
identification and verbally identify himself or herself and his or her role in the
investigation and shall provide written material to the parent or alleged perpetrator
informing him or her of his or her rights regarding such visit, including but not limited to the
right to contact an attorney. The parent or alleged perpetrator shall be given a reasonable
amount of time to read such written material or have such material read to him or her by the
case worker before the visit commences, but in no event shall such time exceed five minutes;
except that, such requirement to provide written material and reasonable time to read such
material shall not apply in cases where the child faces an immediate threat or danger, or the
person responding to or investigating the report is or feels threatened or in danger of physical
harm. If the abuse is alleged to have occurred in a school or child care facility the division
shall not meet with the child in any school building or child care facility building where abuse
of such child is alleged to have occurred. When the child is reported absent from the
residence, the location and the well-being of the child shall be verified. For purposes of this
subsection, child care facility shall have the same meaning as such term is defined in section
100 210.201.
101 (3) If the division is responding to an assessment of abuse or neglect, the person
102 responding shall present identification and verbally identify himself or herself and his or her
103 role in the investigation and provide a parent of the child with notification prior to the child
104 being interviewed by the person responding and shall provide written material to the parent
105 informing him or her of his or her rights regarding such visit, including, but not limited to, the
106 right to contact an attorney. The parent shall be given a reasonable amount of time to read
107 such written material or have such material read to him or her by the case worker before the
108 visit commences, but in no event shall such time exceed five minutes; except that, such
109 requirement to provide written material and reasonable time to read such material shall not
110 apply in cases where the child faces immediate threat or danger, the person responding to or
111 investigating the report is or feels threatened or in danger of physical harm, or any of the
112 exceptions in subdivision (1) of this subsection would apply.

HB 2450 17
113 9. The director of the division shall name at least one chief investigator for each local
114 division office, who shall direct the division response on any case involving a second or
115 subsequent incident regarding the same subject child or perpetrator. The duties of a chief
116 investigator shall include verification of direct observation of the subject child by the division
117 and shall ensure information regarding the status of an investigation is provided to the public
118 school district liaison. The public school district liaison shall develop protocol in conjunction
119 with the chief investigator to ensure information regarding an investigation is shared with
120 appropriate school personnel. The superintendent of each school district shall designate a
121 specific person or persons to act as the public school district liaison. Should the subject child
122 attend a nonpublic school the chief investigator shall notify the school principal of the
123 investigation. Upon notification of an investigation, all information received by the public
124 school district liaison or the school shall be subject to the provisions of the federal Family
125 Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1232g, and federal rule 34
126 C.F.R. Part 99.
127 10. The investigation shall include but not be limited to the nature, extent, and cause
128 of the abuse or neglect; the identity and age of the person responsible for the abuse or neglect;
129 the names and conditions of other children in the home, if any; the home environment and the
130 relationship of the subject child to the parents or other persons responsible for the child's care;
131 any indication of incidents of physical violence against any other household or family
132 member; and other pertinent data.
133 11. When a report has been made by a person required to report under section
134 210.115, the division shall contact the person who made such report within forty-eight hours
135 of the receipt of the report in order to ensure that full information has been received and to
136 obtain any additional information or medical records, or both, that may be pertinent.
137 12. Upon completion of the investigation, if the division suspects that the report was
138 made maliciously or for the purpose of harassment, the division shall refer the report and any
139 evidence of malice or harassment to the local prosecuting or circuit attorney.
140 13. Multidisciplinary teams shall be used whenever conducting the investigation as
141 determined by the division in conjunction with local law enforcement. Multidisciplinary
142 teams shall be used in providing protective or preventive social services, including the
143 services of law enforcement, a liaison of the local public school, the juvenile officer, the
144 juvenile court, and other agencies, both public and private.
145 14. For all family support team meetings involving an alleged victim of child abuse or
146 neglect, the parents, legal counsel for the parents, foster parents, the legal guardian or
147 custodian of the child, the guardian ad litem for the child, the child's counsel, and the
148 volunteer advocate for the child shall be provided notice and be permitted to attend all such
149 meetings. Family members, other than alleged perpetrators, or other community informal or

HB 2450 18
150 formal service providers that provide significant support to the child and other individuals
151 may also be invited at the discretion of the parents of the child. In addition, the parents, the
152 legal counsel for the parents, the legal guardian or custodian and the foster parents may
153 request that other individuals, other than alleged perpetrators, be permitted to attend such
154 team meetings. Once a person is provided notice of or attends such team meetings, the
155 division or the convenor of the meeting shall provide such persons with notice of all such
156 subsequent meetings involving the child. Families may determine whether individuals
157 invited at their discretion shall continue to be invited.
158 15. If the appropriate local division personnel determine after an investigation has
159 begun that completing an investigation is not appropriate, the division shall conduct a family
160 assessment and services approach. The division shall provide written notification to local law
161 enforcement prior to terminating any investigative process. The reason for the termination of
162 the investigative process shall be documented in the record of the division and the written
163 notification submitted to local law enforcement. Such notification shall not preclude nor
164 prevent any investigation by law enforcement.
165 16. If the appropriate local division personnel determines to use a family assessment
166 and services approach, the division shall:
167 (1) Assess any service needs of the family. The assessment of risk and service needs
168 shall be based on information gathered from the family and other sources;
169 (2) Provide services which are voluntary and time-limited unless it is determined by
170 the division based on the assessment of risk that there will be a high risk of abuse or neglect if
171 the family refuses to accept the services. The division shall identify services for families
172 where it is determined that the child is at high risk of future abuse or neglect. The division
173 shall thoroughly document in the record its attempt to provide voluntary services and the
174 reasons these services are important to reduce the risk of future abuse or neglect to the child.
175 If the family continues to refuse voluntary services or the child needs to be protected, the
176 division may commence an investigation;
177 (3) Commence an immediate investigation if at any time during the family
178 assessment and services approach the division determines that an investigation, as delineated
179 in sections 210.109 to 210.183, is required. The division staff who have conducted the
180 assessment may remain involved in the provision of services to the child and family;
181 (4) Document at the time the case is closed, the outcome of the family assessment and
182 services approach, any service provided and the removal of risk to the child, if it existed.
183 17. (1) Within forty-five days of an oral report of abuse or neglect, the local office
184 shall update the information in the information system. The information system shall contain,
185 at a minimum, the determination made by the division as a result of the investigation,
186 identifying information on the subjects of the report, those responsible for the care of the

HB 2450 19
187 subject child and other relevant dispositional information. The division shall complete all
188 investigations within forty-five days, unless good cause for the failure to complete the
189 investigation is specifically documented in the information system. Good cause for failure to
190 complete an investigation shall include, but not be limited to:
191 (a) The necessity to obtain relevant reports of medical providers, medical examiners,
192 psychological testing, law enforcement agencies, forensic testing, and analysis of relevant
193 evidence by third parties which has not been completed and provided to the division;
194 (b) The attorney general or the prosecuting or circuit attorney of the city or county in
195 which a criminal investigation is pending certifies in writing to the division that there is a
196 pending criminal investigation of the incident under investigation by the division and the
197 issuing of a decision by the division will adversely impact the progress of the investigation; or
198 (c) The child victim, the subject of the investigation or another witness with
199 information relevant to the investigation is unable or temporarily unwilling to provide
200 complete information within the specified time frames due to illness, injury, unavailability,
201 mental capacity, age, developmental disability, or other cause.
202
203 The division shall document any such reasons for failure to complete the investigation.
204 (2) If a child fatality or near-fatality is involved in a report of abuse or neglect, the
205 investigation shall remain open until the division's investigation surrounding such death or
206 near-fatal injury is completed.
207 (3) If the investigation is not completed within forty-five days, the information
208 system shall be updated at regular intervals and upon the completion of the investigation,
209 which shall be completed no later than ninety days after receipt of a report of abuse or
210 neglect, or one hundred twenty days after receipt of a report of abuse or neglect involving
211 sexual abuse, or until the division's investigation is complete in cases involving a child
212 fatality or near-fatality. The information in the information system shall be updated to reflect
213 any subsequent findings, including any changes to the findings based on an administrative or
214 judicial hearing on the matter.
215 18. A person required to report under section 210.115 to the division and any person
216 making a report of child abuse or neglect made to the division which is not made
217 anonymously shall be informed by the division of his or her right to obtain information
218 concerning the disposition of his or her report. Such person shall receive, from the local
219 office, if requested, information on the general disposition of his or her report. Such person
220 may receive, if requested, findings and information concerning the case. Such release of
221 information shall be at the discretion of the director based upon a review of the reporter's
222 ability to assist in protecting the child or the potential harm to the child or other children
223 within the family. The local office shall respond to the request within forty-five days. The

HB 2450 20
224 findings shall be made available to the reporter within five days of the outcome of the
225 investigation. If the report is determined to be unsubstantiated, the reporter may request that
226 the report be referred by the division to the office of child advocate for children's protection
227 and services established in sections 37.700 to 37.730. Upon request by a reporter under this
228 subsection, the division shall refer an unsubstantiated report of child abuse or neglect to the
229 office of child advocate for children's protection and services.
230 19. The division shall provide to any individual who is not satisfied with the results of
231 an investigation information about the office of child advocate and the services it may provide
232 under sections 37.700 to 37.730.
233 20. In any judicial proceeding involving the custody of a child the fact that a report
234 may have been made pursuant to sections 210.109 to 210.183 shall not be admissible.
235 However:
236 (1) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the introduction of evidence from
237 independent sources to support the allegations that may have caused a report to have been
238 made; and
239 (2) The court may on its own motion, or shall if requested by a party to the
240 proceeding, make an inquiry not on the record with the children's division to determine if
241 such a report has been made.
242
243 If a report has been made, the court may stay the custody proceeding until the children's
244 division completes its investigation.
245 21. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the children's division from
246 coinvestigating a report of child abuse or neglect or sharing records and information with
247 child welfare, law enforcement, or judicial officers of another state, territory, or nation if the
248 children's division determines it is appropriate to do so under the standard set forth in
249 subsection 4 of section 210.150 and if such receiving agency is exercising its authority under
250 the law.
251 22. In any judicial proceeding involving the custody of a child where the court
252 determines that the child is in need of services under paragraph (d) of subdivision (1) of
253 subsection 1 of section 211.031 and has taken jurisdiction, the child's parent, guardian or
254 custodian shall not be entered into the registry.
255 23. The children's division is hereby granted the authority to promulgate rules and
256 regulations pursuant to the provisions of section 207.021 and chapter 536 to carry out the
257 provisions of sections 210.109 to 210.183.
258 24. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
259 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
260 with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.

HB 2450 21
261 This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
262 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to
263 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
264 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2000, shall be invalid
265 and void.
210.156. 1. The children's division shall make available to the state registrar of vital
statistics the identifying information of the following individuals of whom the division has
knowledge:
(1) Individuals whose parental rights have been terminated under section 211.447 and
who are identified in the central registry as having a finding by the division or a court
adjudication of child abuse or neglect within the previous ten years; and
(2) Individuals identified in the central registry who have pled guilty or have been
found guilty, within the previous ten years, of an offense under the following, if the victim is a
child less than eighteen years of age: chapter 566 or section 565.020, 565.021, 565.023,
565.024, 567.016, 567.050 as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, 568.020, 568.065,
573.023, 573.025, 573.035, 573.037, 573.040, 573.200, or 573.205.
2. The state registrar shall provide to the division the birth record information of
children born to individuals whose identifying information has been provided under
subsection 1 of this section. The division shall verify that the parent of the child is the same
individual whose identifying information was provided and, if the parent's identity has been
verified, shall provide the appropriate local office with information regarding the birth of the
child. Appropriate local division personnel, or local providers designated by the division,
shall initiate contact with the family, or make a good faith effort to do so, to determine if the
parent or family has a need for services and provide such voluntary and time-limited services
as appropriate. The division shall document the results of such contact and services provided,
if any, in the information system established under section 210.109.
3. The children's division and the state registrar shall ensure the confidentiality of all
identifying information and birth records provided under this section and shall not disclose
such information and records except as needed to effectuate the provisions of this section.
Such information and records shall be considered closed records under chapter 610.
4. The division may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

HB 2450 22
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2021, shall be invalid
and void.
226.531. 1. As used in this section the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar establishment in which
persons appear in a state of nudity, as defined in section 573.500, or seminudity, in the
performance of their duties;
(2) "Seminudity", a state of dress in which opaque clothing fails to cover the genitals,
anus, anal cleft or cleavage, pubic area, vulva, nipple and areola of the female breast below a
horizontal line across the top of the areola at its highest point. Seminudity shall include the
entire lower portion of the female breast, but shall not include any portion of the cleavage of
the human female breast exhibited by wearing apparel provided the areola is not exposed in
whole or part;
(3) "Sexually oriented business", any business which offers its patrons goods of
which a substantial portion are sexually oriented materials. Any business where more than
ten percent of display space is used for sexually oriented materials shall be presumed to be a
sexually oriented business;
(4) "Sexually oriented materials", any textual, pictorial, or three-dimensional material
that depicts nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse in a way
which is patently offensive to the average person applying contemporary adult community
standards with respect to what is suitable for minors.
2. No billboard or other exterior advertising sign for an adult cabaret or sexually
oriented business shall be located within one mile of any state highway except if such
business is located within one mile of a state highway then the business may display a
maximum of two exterior signs on the premises of the business, consisting of one
identification sign and one sign solely giving notice that the premises are off limits to minors.
The identification sign shall be no more than forty square feet in size and shall include no
more than the following information: name, street address, telephone number, and operating
hours of the business.
3. Signs existing on August 28, 2004, which did not conform to the requirements of
this section, may be allowed to continue as a nonconforming use, but should be made to
conform within three years from August 28, 2004.
4. Any owner of such a business who violates the provisions of this section shall be
guilty of a class C misdemeanor. Each week a violation of this section continues to exist shall
constitute a separate offense.
5. This section is designed to protect the following public policy interests of this state,
including but not limited to: to mitigate the adverse secondary effects of sexually oriented
businesses, to improve traffic safety, to limit harm to minors, and to reduce [prostitution]

HB 2450 23
commercial sexual exploitation, crime, juvenile delinquency, deterioration in property
values, and lethargy in neighborhood improvement efforts.
513.605. As used in sections 513.600 to 513.645, unless the context clearly indicates
otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) (a) "Beneficial interest":
a. The interest of a person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement pursuant
to which a trustee holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of such person; or
b. The interest of a person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement
pursuant to which any other person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit
of such person;
(b) "Beneficial interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation
or the interest of a partner in either a general partnership or limited partnership. A beneficial
interest shall be deemed to be located where the real property owned by the trustee is located;
(2) "Civil proceeding", any civil suit commenced by an investigative agency under
any provision of sections 513.600 to 513.645;
(3) "Criminal activity" is the commission, attempted commission, conspiracy to
commit, or the solicitation, coercion or intimidation of another person to commit any crime
which is chargeable by indictment or information under the following Missouri laws:
(a) Chapter 195, relating to drug regulations;
(b) Chapter 301, relating to registration and licensing of motor vehicles;
(c) Chapter 304, but relating only to felony violations of this chapter involving the
use of a motor vehicle;
(d) Chapter 311, but relating only to felony violations of this chapter committed by
persons not duly licensed by the supervisor of liquor control;
(e) Chapter 409, relating to regulation of securities;
(f) Chapter 491, relating to witnesses;
(g) Chapter 565, relating to offenses against the person;
(h) Chapter 566, relating to sexual offenses;
(i) Chapter 567, relating to prostitution as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or
commercial sexual exploitation;
(j) Chapter 568, relating to offenses against the family;
(k) Chapter 569, relating to robbery, arson, burglary and related offenses;
(l) Chapter 570, relating to stealing and related offenses;
(m) Chapter 571, relating to weapons offenses;
(n) Chapter 572, relating to gambling;
(o) Chapter 573, relating to pornography and related offenses;
(p) Chapter 574, relating to offenses against public order;

HB 2450 24
(q) Chapter 575, relating to offenses against the administration of justice;
(r) Chapter 578, but only relating to offenses by a criminal street gang;
(4) "Criminal proceeding", any criminal prosecution commenced by an investigative
agency under any criminal law of this state;
(5) "Investigative agency", the attorney general's office, or the office of any
prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney;
(6) "Pecuniary value":
(a) Anything of value in the form of money, a negotiable instrument, a commercial
interest, or anything else the primary significance of which is economic advantage; or
(b) Any other property or service that has a value in excess of one hundred dollars;
(7) "Real property", any estate or legal or equitable interest in land situated in this
state or any interest in such real property, including, but not limited to, any lease or deed of
trust upon such real property;
(8) "Seizing agency", the agency which is the primary employer of the officer or
agent seizing the property, including any agency in which one or more of the employees
acting on behalf of the seizing agency is employed by the state of Missouri or any political
subdivision of this state;
(9) "Seizure", the point at which any law enforcement officer or agent discovers and
exercises any control over property that an officer or agent has reason to believe was used or
intended for use in the course of, derived from, or realized through criminal activity. Seizure
includes but is not limited to preventing anyone found in possession of the property from
leaving the scene of the investigation while in possession of the property;
(10) (a) "Trustee":
a. Any person who holds legal or record title to real property for which any other
person has a beneficial interest; or
b. Any successor trustee or trustees to any of the foregoing persons;
(b) "Trustee" does not include the following:
a. Any person appointed or acting as a personal representative under chapter 475 or
under chapter 473;
b. Any person appointed or acting as a trustee of any testamentary trust or as trustee
of any indenture of trust under which any bonds are or are to be issued.
545.940. 1. Pursuant to a motion filed by the prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney
with notice given to the defense attorney and for good cause shown, in any criminal case in
which a defendant has been charged by the prosecuting attorney's office or circuit attorney's
office with any offense under chapter 566 or section 565.050, assault in the first degree;
section 565.052 or 565.060, assault in the second degree; section 565.054 or 565.070, assault
in the third degree; section 565.056, assault in the fourth degree; section 565.072, domestic

HB 2450 25
assault in the first degree; section 565.073, domestic assault in the second degree; section
565.074, domestic assault in the third degree; section 565.075, assault while on school
property; section 565.076, domestic assault in the fourth degree; section 565.081, 565.082, or
565.083, assault of a law enforcement officer, corrections officer, emergency personnel,
highway worker in a construction zone or work zone, utility worker, cable worker, or
probation and parole officer in the first, second, or third degree; section 567.016, commercial
sexual exploitation; section 567.020, prostitution as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree; section 568.050,
endangering the welfare of a child in the second degree; section 568.060, abuse of a child;
section 575.150, resisting or interfering with an arrest; or subdivision (2) or (3) of subsection
2 of section 191.677, knowingly or recklessly exposing a person to a serious infectious or
communicable disease, the court may order that the defendant be conveyed to a state-, city-,
or county-operated HIV clinic for testing for HIV, hepatitis B, hepatitis C, syphilis,
gonorrhea, and chlamydia. The results of such tests shall be released to the victim and his or
her parent or legal guardian if the victim is a minor. The results of such tests shall also be
released to the prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney and the defendant's attorney. The
state's motion to obtain said testing, the court's order of the same, and the test results shall be
sealed in the court file.
2. As used in this section, "HIV" means the human immunodeficiency virus that
causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
566.103. 1. A person or entity commits the offense of promoting online sexual
solicitation if such person or entity knowingly permits a web-based classified service owned
or operated by such person or entity to be used by individuals to post advertisements
promoting [prostitution] commercial sexual exploitation, enticing a child to engage in
sexual conduct, or promoting sexual trafficking of a child after receiving notice under this
section.
2. As used in this section, the term "web-based classified service" means a person or
entity in whose name a specific URL or internet domain name is registered which has
advertisements for goods and services or personal advertisements.
3. An advertisement may be deemed to promote [prostitution] commercial sexual
exploitation, entice a child to engage in sexual conduct, or promote sexual trafficking of a
child, if the content of such advertisement would be interpreted by a reasonable person [as
offering to exchange sexual conduct for goods or services in violation of chapter 567,] as
seeking a child for the purpose of sexual conduct or commercial sex act, or as offering a child
as a participant in sexual conduct or commercial sex act in violation of section 566.151,
566.210, or 566.211.

HB 2450 26
4. It shall be prima facie evidence that a person or entity acts knowingly if an
advertisement is not removed from the web-based classified service within seventy-two hours
of that person or entity being notified that an advertisement has been posted on that service
which is prohibited under this section.
5. Notice under this section may be provided by certified mail or facsimile
transmission by the attorney general or any prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.
6. A violation of this section shall be a felony, punishable by a fine in the amount of
five thousand dollars per day that the advertisement remains posted on the web-based
classified service after seventy-two hours of when notice has been provided pursuant to this
section.
7. Original jurisdiction for prosecution of a violation of this section shall be with the
local prosecuting attorney or circuit attorney.
566.223. 1. Any individual who is alleging that a violation of sections 566.200 to
566.218 and section 578.475 has occurred against his or her person shall be afforded the
rights and protections provided in the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000,
Public Law 106-386, as amended.
2. [It is an affirmative defense for the offense of prostitution under section 567.020
that the defendant engaged in the conduct charged to constitute an offense because he or she
was coerced to do so by the use of, or threatened use of, unlawful physical force upon himself
or herself or a third person, which force or threatened force a person of reasonable firmness in
his or her situation would have been unable to resist.
3.] The department of public safety is authorized to establish procedures for
identifying victims of trafficking under sections 566.200 to 566.223. The department may
establish training programs as well as standard protocols for appropriate agencies to educate
officials and employees on state statutes and federal laws regulating human trafficking and
with the identification and assistance of victims of human trafficking. Such agencies may
include but not be limited to state employees and contractors, including the children's division
of the department of social services, juvenile courts, state law enforcement agencies, health
care professionals, and runaway and homeless youth shelter administrators.
[4.] 3. As soon as possible after a first encounter with a person who reasonably
appears to a law enforcement agency to be a victim of trafficking as defined in section
566.200, that agency or office shall notify the department of social services and, where
applicable, juvenile justice authorities that the person may be a victim of trafficking, in order
that such agencies may determine whether the person may be eligible for state or federal
services, programs, or assistance.
[5.] 4. The department of social services may coordinate with relevant state, federal,
and local agencies to evaluate appropriate services for victims of trafficking. State agencies

HB 2450 27
may implement programs and enter into contracts with nonprofit agencies, domestic and
sexual violence shelters, and other nongovernment organizations to provide services to
confirmed victims of trafficking, insofar as funds are available for that purpose. Such
services may include, but are not limited to, case management, emergency temporary
housing, health care, mental health counseling, alcohol and drug addiction screening and
treatment, language interpretation and translation services, English language instruction, job
training, and placement assistance.
[6.] 5. A victim of trafficking may bring a civil action against a person or persons who
plead guilty to or are found guilty of a violation of section 566.203, 566.206, 566.209,
566.210, or 566.211 to recover the actual damages sustained by the victim, court costs,
including reasonable attorney's fees, and punitive damages, when determined to be
appropriate by the court. Any action commenced under this section shall be filed within
ten years after the later of:
(1) The final order in the related criminal case;
(2) The victim's emancipation from the defendant; or
(3) The victim's eighteenth birthday.
[7.] 6. The attorney general may bring a civil action, in the circuit court in which the
victim of trafficking was found, to recover from any person or entity that benefits, financially
or by receiving anything of value, from violations of section 566.203, 566.206, 566.209,
566.210, or 566.211, a civil penalty of not more than fifty thousand dollars for each violation
of section 566.203, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, or 566.211, and injunctive and other equitable
relief as the court may, in its discretion, order. The first priority of any money or property
collected under such an action shall be to pay restitution to the victims of trafficking on whose
behalf the civil action was brought.
567.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms mean:
(1) ["Deviate sexual intercourse", any sexual act involving the genitals of one person
and the mouth, hand, tongue, or anus of another person; or any act involving the penetration,
however slight, of the penis, the female genitalia, or the anus by a finger, instrument, or object
done for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person or for the
purpose of terrorizing the victim;
(2) "Persistent prostitution offender", a person who has been found guilty of two or
more prostitution-related offenses;
(3) "Prostitution-related offense", any violation of state law for prostitution,
patronizing prostitution, or promoting prostitution;
(4) "Sexual conduct", sexual intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse, or sexual
contact;

HB 2450 28
(5) "Sexual contact", any touching of another person with the genitals or any touching
of the genitals or anus of another person or the breast of a female person, or such touching
through the clothing, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying sexual desire of any person or
for the purpose of terrorizing the victim;
(6) "Sexual intercourse", any penetration, however slight, of the female genitalia by
the penis;
(7) "Something of value", any money or property, or any token, object or article
exchangeable for money or property] "Coercion":
(a) A threat of serious harm, including physical or financial harm, to or physical
restraint against any person;
(b) Any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to cause a person to believe that
failure to perform an act would result in serious bodily or financial harm to or physical
restraint of any person;
(c) The abuse or threatened abuse of law or legal process;
(d) Withholding, destroying, or confiscating any actual or purported passport,
immigration document, or any other government identification document of another
person;
(e) Providing a drug, including alcohol, to another person with the intent to
impair the person's judgment or maintain a state of chemical dependence;
(f) Wrongfully taking, obtaining, or withholding any property of another
person;
(g) Blackmail;
(h) Asserting control over the finances of another person; or
(i) Withholding or threatening to withhold food or medication;
(2) "Commercial sex act", any sex act, which includes sexual penetration,
masturbation, or sexual activity, on account of which anything of value is given to,
promised, or received by any person;
(3) "Sexual activity", any:
(a) Knowing touching or fondling by another person, either directly or through
clothing, of the sex organs, anus, or breast of the victim or another person for the
purpose of sexual gratification or arousal;
(b) Transfer or transmission of semen upon any part of the clothed or unclothed
body of a person for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of another;
(c) Act of urination within a sexual context;
(d) Bondage, fetter, sadism, or masochism; or
(e) Sadomasochism abuse in any sexual context.

HB 2450 29
567.016. 1. A person commits the offense of commercial sexual exploitation if
such person:
(1) Patronizes a person under eighteen years of age for a commercial sex act;
(2) Patronizes any person for a commercial sex act and such person is being
compelled through force, fraud, or coercion to engage in the commercial sex act;
(3) Knowingly promotes a commercial sex act of a person who is under eighteen
years of age;
(4) Knowingly promotes a commercial sex act by coercing any person to enter
into, engage in, or remain in commercial sexual exploitation; or
(5) Owns, manages, or operates an interactive computer service, or conspires or
attempts to do so, with the intent to promote or facilitate commercial sexual exploitation
that contributed to the offense of trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation
under section 566.209. As used in this subdivision, "interactive computer service"
means any information service, system, or access software provider that provides or
enables computer access by multiple users to a computer server, including specifically a
service or system that provides access to the internet and such systems operated or
services offered by libraries or educational institutions.
2. It shall be an affirmative defense under subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this
section if the person patronizing commercial sexual exploitation had no knowledge that
the commercial sex act was being compelled through force, fraud, or coercion.
3. It shall not be a defense under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section
that the person believed that the individual he or she patronized for a commercial sex
act was eighteen years of age or older.
4. Promoting commercial sexual exploitation under subdivision (3) of subsection
1 of this section shall be considered abuse of a child, as defined under section 210.110,
and such abuse shall be reported as required under section 210.115.
5. The offense of commercial sexual exploitation under subdivision (1) of
subsection 1 of this section is a class E felony if the person patronized is fifteen years of
age or older but under eighteen years of age and a class D felony if the person
patronized is fourteen years of age or under. Nothing in this subsection shall preclude
the prosecution of an individual for the offenses of:
(1) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032; or
(2) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034.
6. The offense of commercial sexual exploitation under subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section is a class B misdemeanor.
7. The offense of commercial sexual exploitation under subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of this section is a class D felony if the person being promoted is sixteen or

HB 2450 30
seventeen years of age and a class B felony if the person being promoted is under sixteen
years of age.
8. The offense of commercial sexual exploitation under subdivision (4) of
subsection 1 of this section is a class B felony.
9. The offense of commercial sexual exploitation under subdivision (5) of
subsection 1 of this section is a class A felony.
10. (1) A person injured by the acts committed in violation of subdivision (5) of
subsection 1 of this section or subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section if the person
being promoted is under sixteen years of age shall have a civil cause of action to recover
damages and reasonable attorney's fees for such injury.
(2) In addition to the court's authority to order a defendant to make restitution
for the damage or loss caused by his or her offense as provided under section 559.105,
the court shall enter a judgment of restitution against the defendant convicted of
violating subdivision (5) of subsection 1 of this section or subdivision (3) of subsection 1
of this section.
567.080. 1. Any room, building or other structure regularly used for [any prostitution
activity] commercial sexual exploitation prohibited by this chapter is a public nuisance.
2. The attorney general, circuit attorney or prosecuting attorney may, in addition to all
criminal sanctions, prosecute a suit in equity to enjoin the nuisance. If the court finds that the
owner of the room, building or structure knew or had reason to believe that the premises were
being used regularly for [prostitution activity] commercial sexual exploitation, the court
may order that the premises shall not be occupied or used for such period as the court may
determine, not to exceed one year.
3. All persons, including owners, lessees, officers, agents, inmates or employees,
aiding or facilitating such a nuisance may be made defendants in any suit to enjoin the
nuisance, and they may be enjoined from engaging in [any prostitution activity] commercial
sexual exploitation anywhere within the jurisdiction of the court.
4. Appeals shall be allowed from the judgment of the court as in other civil actions.
573.503. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any city not within a
county and any county may, by order or ordinance, require a background check be conducted
on all employees of any adult cabaret to ascertain whether any such employees have been
convicted of or have pled guilty to any misdemeanor or felony involving prostitution as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, or aiding or abetting prostitution as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026, commercial sexual exploitation, drug possession or trafficking, money
laundering, tax evasion, or illegal gambling activity.
573.525. 1. It is the purpose of sections 573.525 to 573.537 to regulate sexually
oriented businesses in order to promote the health, safety, and general welfare of the citizens

HB 2450 31
of this state, and to establish reasonable and uniform regulations to prevent the deleterious
secondary effects of sexually oriented businesses within the state. The provisions of sections
573.525 to 573.537 have neither the purpose nor effect of imposing a limitation or restriction
on the content or reasonable access to any communicative materials, including sexually
oriented materials. Similarly, it is neither the intent nor effect of sections 573.525 to 573.537
to restrict or deny access by adults to sexually oriented materials protected by the first
amendment, or to deny access by the distributors and exhibitors of sexually oriented
entertainment to their intended market. Neither is it the intent nor effect of sections 573.525
to 573.537 to condone or legitimize the distribution of obscene material.
2. The general assembly finds that:
(1) Sexually oriented businesses, as a category of commercial enterprises, are
associated with a wide variety of adverse secondary effects, including but not limited to
personal and property crimes, [prostitution,] commercial sexual exploitation, potential
spread of disease, lewdness, public indecency, obscenity, illicit drug use and drug trafficking,
negative impacts on surrounding properties, urban blight, litter, and sexual assault and
exploitation;
(2) Sexually oriented businesses should be separated from sensitive land uses to
minimize the impact of their secondary effects upon such uses, and should be separated from
other sexually oriented businesses, to minimize the secondary effects associated with such
uses and to prevent an unnecessary concentration of sexually oriented businesses in one area;
(3) Each of the foregoing negative secondary effects constitutes a harm which the
state has a substantial interest in preventing or abating, or both. Such substantial government
interest in preventing secondary effects, which is the state's rationale for sections 573.525 to
573.537, exists independent of any comparative analysis between sexually oriented and
nonsexually oriented businesses. Additionally, the state's interest in regulating sexually
oriented businesses extends to preventing future secondary effects of current or future
sexually oriented businesses that may locate in the state.
573.531. 1. No person shall establish a sexually oriented business within one
thousand feet of any preexisting primary or secondary school, house of worship, state-
licensed day care facility, public library, public park, residence, or other sexually oriented
business. This subsection shall not apply to any sexually oriented business lawfully
established prior to August 28, 2010. For purposes of this subsection, measurements shall be
made in a straight line, without regard to intervening structures or objects, from the closest
portion of the parcel containing the sexually oriented business to the closest portion of the
parcel containing the preexisting primary or secondary school, house of worship, state-
licensed day care facility, public library, public park, residence, or other sexually oriented
business.

HB 2450 32
2. No person shall establish a sexually oriented business if a person with an
influential interest in the sexually oriented business has been found guilty of any of the
following specified offenses for which less than eight years has elapsed since the date of
conviction or the date of release from confinement for the conviction, whichever is later:
(1) Rape and sexual assault offenses;
(2) Sexual offenses involving minors;
(3) Offenses involving prostitution as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or
commercial sexual exploitation;
(4) Obscenity offenses;
(5) Offenses involving money laundering;
(6) Offenses involving tax evasion;
(7) Any attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit one of the offenses listed in
subdivisions (1) to (6) of this subsection; or
(8) Any offense committed in another jurisdiction which if committed in this state
would have constituted an offense listed in subdivisions (1) to (7) of this subsection.
3. No person shall knowingly or intentionally, in a sexually oriented business, appear
in a state of nudity.
4. No employee shall knowingly or intentionally, in a sexually oriented business,
appear in a semi-nude condition unless the employee, while semi-nude, shall be and remain
on a fixed stage at least six feet from all patrons and at least eighteen inches from the floor in
a room of at least six hundred square feet.
5. No employee, who appears in a semi-nude condition in a sexually oriented
business, shall knowingly or intentionally touch a patron or the clothing of a patron in a
sexually oriented business.
6. A sexually oriented business, which exhibits on the premises, through any
mechanical or electronic image-producing device, a film, video cassette, digital video disc, or
other video reproduction, characterized by an emphasis on the display of specified sexual
activities or specified anatomical areas shall comply with the following requirements:
(1) The interior of the premises shall be configured in such a manner that there is an
unobstructed view from an operator's station of every area of the premises, including the
interior of each viewing room but excluding restrooms, to which any patron is permitted
access for any purpose;
(2) An operator's station shall not exceed thirty-two square feet of floor area;
(3) If the premises has two or more operator's stations designated, the interior of the
premises shall be configured in such a manner that there is an unobstructed view of each area
of the premises to which any patron is permitted access for any purpose from at least one of
the operator's stations;

HB 2450 33
(4) The view required under this subsection shall be by direct line of sight from the
operator's station;
(5) It is the duty of the operator to ensure that at least one employee is on duty and
situated in an operator's station at all times that any patron is on the portion of the premises
monitored by such operator station; and
(6) It shall be the duty of the operator and of any employees present on the premises
to ensure that the view area specified in this subsection remains unobstructed by any doors,
curtains, walls, merchandise, display racks, or other materials or enclosures at all times that
any patron is present on the premises.
7. Sexually oriented businesses that do not have stages or interior configurations
which meet at least the minimum requirements of sections 573.525 to 573.537 shall be given
one hundred eighty days after August 28, 2010, to comply with the stage and building
requirements of sections 573.525 to 573.537. During such one hundred eighty-day period,
any employee who appears within view of any patron in a semi-nude condition shall remain,
while semi-nude, at least six feet from all patrons.
8. No operator shall allow or permit a sexually oriented business to be or remain open
between the hours of 12:00 midnight and 6:00 a.m. on any day.
9. No person shall knowingly or intentionally sell, use, or consume alcoholic
beverages on the premises of a sexually oriented business.
10. No person shall knowingly allow a person under the age of eighteen years on the
premises of a sexually oriented business.
11. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Establish" or "establishment", includes any of the following:
(a) The opening or commencement of any sexually oriented business as a new
business;
(b) The conversion of an existing business, whether or not a sexually oriented
business, to any sexually oriented business; or
(c) The addition of any sexually oriented business to any other existing sexually
oriented business;
(2) "Influential interest", includes any of the following:
(a) The actual power to operate a sexually oriented business or control the operation,
management, or policies of a sexually oriented business or legal entity which operates a
sexually oriented business;
(b) Ownership of a financial interest of thirty percent or more of a business or of any
class of voting securities of a business; or
(c) Holding an office, such as president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, managing
member, or managing director, in a legal entity which operates a sexually oriented business;

HB 2450 34
(3) "Viewing room", the room, booth, or area where a patron of a sexually oriented
business would ordinarily be positioned while watching a film, video cassette, digital video
disc, or other video reproduction.
577.675. 1. A person commits the offense of transportation of an illegal alien if he or
she knowingly transports, moves, or attempts to transport or move any illegal alien who is not
lawfully present in the United States, according to the terms of 8 U.S.C. Section 1101, et seq.,
for the purposes of trafficking in violation of sections 566.200 to 566.215, drug trafficking in
violation of sections 579.065 and 579.068, prostitution as it existed prior to August 28,
2026, or commercial sexual exploitation in violation of chapter 567, or employment.
2. The offense of transportation of an illegal alien is a class D felony.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to deny any victim of an offense under
sections 566.200 to 566.215 of rights afforded by the federal Trafficking Victims Protection
Act of 2000, Public Law 106-386, as amended.
578.421. 1. Sections 578.421 to 578.437 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Criminal Street Gangs Prevention Act".
2. As used in sections 578.421 to 578.437, the following terms mean:
(1) "Criminal street gang", any ongoing organization, association, or group of three or
more persons, whether formal or informal, having as one of its motivating activities the
commission of one or more of the criminal acts enumerated in subdivision (2) of this
subsection, whose members individually or collectively engage in or have engaged in a
pattern of criminal gang activity;
(2) "Pattern of criminal street gang activity", the commission, attempted commission,
or solicitation of two or more of the following offenses, provided at least one of those
offenses occurred after August 28, 1993, and the last of those offenses occurred within three
years after a prior offense, and the offenses are committed on separate occasions, or by two or
more persons:
(a) Assault with a deadly weapon or by means of force likely to cause serious
physical injury, as provided in sections 565.050 and 565.052;
(b) Robbery, arson and those offenses under chapter 569 which are related to robbery
and arson;
(c) Murder or manslaughter, as provided in sections 565.020 to 565.024;
(d) Any violation of the provisions of chapter 579 which involves the distribution,
delivery or manufacture of a substance prohibited by chapter 579;
(e) Unlawful use of a weapon which is a felony pursuant to section 571.030;
(f) Tampering with witnesses and victims, as provided in section 575.270;
(g) Promoting online sexual solicitation, as provided in section 566.103;
(h) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree, as provided in section 566.210;

HB 2450 35
(i) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree, as provided in section 566.211;
(j) Patronizing prostitution, as provided in subsection 4 of section 567.030, as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, or commercial sexual exploitation, as provided under
subsection 5 of section 567.016;
(k) Promoting prostitution in the first degree, as provided in section 567.050, as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, or commercial sexual exploitation, as provided in
section 567.016;
(l) Promoting prostitution in the second degree, as provided in section 567.060, as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, or commercial sexual exploitation, as provided in
section 567.016;
(m) Abuse or neglect of a child, as provided in subsection 7 of section 568.060;
(n) Sexual exploitation of a minor, as provided in section 573.023;
(o) Child used in sexual performance, as provided in section 573.200;
(p) Promoting sexual performance by a child, as provided in section 573.205; or
(q) Any dangerous felony, as defined in section 556.061.
589.400. 1. Sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall apply to:
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter adjudicated for an
offense referenced in section 589.414, unless such person is exempt from registering under
subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section 589.401;
(2) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter convicted of, been
found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to committing, attempting to commit, or
conspiring to commit one or more of the following offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in the
first degree when the victim was a child and the defendant was not a parent or guardian of the
child; abuse of a child under section 568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature; felonious
restraint or kidnapping in the second degree when the victim was a child and the defendant is
not a parent or guardian of the child; sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a resident of a
nursing home or sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the
first or second degree; endangering the welfare of a child under section 568.045 when the
endangerment is sexual in nature; genital mutilation of a female child, under section 568.065;
promoting prostitution in the first degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting
prostitution in the second degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting
prostitution in the third degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; commercial sexual
exploitation; sexual exploitation of a minor; promoting child pornography in the first degree;
promoting child pornography in the second degree; possession of child pornography;
furnishing pornographic material to minors; public display of explicit sexual material;
coercing acceptance of obscene material; promoting obscenity in the first degree; promoting
pornography for minors or obscenity in the second degree; incest; use of a child in a sexual

HB 2450 36
performance; or promoting sexual performance by a child; patronizing prostitution if the
individual the person patronizes is less than eighteen years of age;
(3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been committed to the department of
mental health as a criminal sexual psychopath;
(4) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been found not guilty as a result of
mental disease or defect of any offense referenced in section 589.414;
(5) Any juvenile certified as an adult and transferred to a court of general jurisdiction
who has been adjudicated for an offense listed under section 589.414;
(6) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or older at the time of the offense who has
been adjudicated for an offense which is equal to or more severe than aggravated sexual abuse
under 18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which shall include any attempt or conspiracy to commit such
offense;
(7) Any person who is a resident of this state who has, since July 1, 1979, been or is
hereafter adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country,
or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed in this state,
would constitute an offense listed under section 589.414, or has been or is required to register
in another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is
required to register under tribal, federal, or military law; or
(8) Any person who has been or is required to register in another state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is required to register under tribal,
federal, or military law and who works or attends an educational institution, whether public or
private in nature, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
institution of higher education on a full-time or on a part-time basis or has a temporary
residence in Missouri. "Part-time" in this subdivision means for more than seven days in any
twelve-month period.
2. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply shall, within three business
days of adjudication, release from incarceration, or placement upon probation, register with
the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county in which such
person resides unless such person has already registered in that county for the same offense.
For any juvenile under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section, within three business
days of adjudication or release from commitment to the division of youth services, the
department of mental health, or other placement, such juvenile shall register with the chief
law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county in which he or she resides
unless he or she has already registered in such county or city not within a county for the same
offense. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply if not currently registered in
their county of residence shall register with the chief law enforcement official of such county
or city not within a county within three business days. The chief law enforcement official

HB 2450 37
shall forward a copy of the registration form required by section 589.407 to a city, town,
village, or campus law enforcement agency located within the county of the chief law
enforcement official.
3. The registration requirements of sections 589.400 through 589.425 shall be as
provided under subsection 4 of this section unless:
(1) All offenses requiring registration are reversed, vacated, or set aside;
(2) The registrant is no longer required to register and his or her name shall be
removed from the registry under the provisions of section 589.414; or
(3) The court orders the removal or exemption of such person from the registry under
section 589.401.
4. The registration requirements shall be as follows:
(1) Fifteen years if the offender is a tier I sex offender as provided under section
589.414;
(2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a tier II sex offender as provided under section
589.414; or
(3) The life of the offender if the offender is a tier III sex offender.
5. (1) The registration period shall be reduced as described in subdivision (3) of this
subsection for a sex offender who maintains a clean record for the periods described under
subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
(a) Not being adjudicated of any offense for which imprisonment for more than one
year may be imposed;
(b) Not being adjudicated of any sex offense;
(c) Successfully completing any periods of supervised release, probation, or parole;
and
(d) Successfully completing an appropriate sex offender treatment program certified
by the attorney general.
(2) In the case of a:
(a) Tier I sex offender, the period during which the clean record shall be maintained is
ten years;
(b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent for the offense which required
registration in a sex offender registry under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the period during
which the clean record shall be maintained is twenty-five years.
(3) In the case of a:
(a) Tier I sex offender, the reduction is five years;
(b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent, the reduction is from life to that
period for which the clean record under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this subsection is
maintained.

HB 2450 38
6. For processing an initial sex offender registration the chief law enforcement officer
of the county or city not within a county may charge the offender registering a fee of up to ten
dollars.
100 7. For processing any change in registration required pursuant to section 589.414 the
101 chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county may charge the person
102 changing their registration a fee of five dollars for each change made after the initial
103 registration.
104 8. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
105 required to register for being adjudicated for the offense of felonious restraint of a nonsexual
106 nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the child,
107 nonsexual child abuse that was committed under section 568.060, or kidnapping of a
108 nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the
109 child shall be removed from the registry. However, such person shall remain on the sexual
110 offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to register under
111 sections 589.400 to 589.425.
112 9. The following persons shall be exempt from registering as a sexual offender upon
113 petition to the court of jurisdiction under section 589.401; except that, such person shall
114 remain on the sexual offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to
115 register under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
116 (1) Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
117 required to register for a sexual offense involving:
118 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim or
119 any other individual involved, if the victim was an adult, unless the adult was under the
120 custodial authority of the offender at the time of the offense; or
121 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim,
122 the victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the offender was not more than four years
123 older than the victim at the time of the offense; or
124 (2) Any person currently required to register for the following sexual offenses:
125 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
126 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
127 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040;
128 (d) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060;
129 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065;
130 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced
131 labor under section 566.206;
132 (g) Abusing an individual through forced labor under section 566.203;

HB 2450 39
133 (h) Contributing to human trafficking through the misuse of documentation under
134 section 566.215; or
135 (i) Acting as an international marriage broker and failing to provide the information
136 and notice as required under section 578.475.
137 10. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry for having been adjudicated
138 for a tier I or II offense or adjudicated delinquent for a tier III offense or other comparable
139 offenses listed under section 589.414 may file a petition under section 589.401.
140 11. Any nonresident worker, including work as a volunteer or intern, or nonresident
141 student shall register for the duration of such person's employment, including participation as
142 a volunteer or intern, or attendance at any school of higher education whether public or
143 private, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or institution of
144 higher education on a full-time or part-time basis in this state unless granted relief under
145 section 589.401. Any registered offender shall provide information regarding any place in
146 which the offender is staying when away from his or her residence for seven or more days,
147 including the period of time the offender is staying in such place. Any registered offender
148 from another state who has a temporary residence in this state and resides more than seven
149 days in a twelve-month period shall register for the duration of such person's temporary
150 residency unless granted relief under section 589.401.
589.414. 1. Any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register shall,
within three business days, appear in person to the chief law enforcement officer of the
county or city not within a county if there is a change to any of the following information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a volunteer or intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items listed in this subsection.
2. Any person required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall, within
three business days, notify the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within
a county of any changes to the following information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) Temporary lodging information;
(3) Temporary residence information;
(4) Email addresses, instant messaging addresses, and any other designations used in
internet communications, postings, or telephone communications; or
(5) Telephone or other cellular number, including any new forms of electronic
communication.

HB 2450 40
3. The chief law enforcement official in the county or city not within a county shall
immediately forward the registration changes described under subsections 1 and 2 of this
section to the Missouri state highway patrol within three business days.
4. If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes such
person's residence or address to a different county or city not within a county, the person shall
appear in person and shall inform both the chief law enforcement official with whom the
person last registered and the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a
county having jurisdiction over the new residence or address in writing within three business
days of such new address and phone number, if the phone number is also changed. If any
person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes his or her state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of
residence, the person shall appear in person and shall inform both the chief law enforcement
official with whom the person was last registered and the chief law enforcement official of the
area in the new state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal,
or military jurisdiction having jurisdiction over the new residence or address within three
business days of such new address. Whenever a registrant changes residence, the chief law
enforcement official of the county or city not within a county where the person was
previously registered shall inform the Missouri state highway patrol of the change within
three business days. When the registrant is changing the residence to a new state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall inform the responsible official in the new state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of
residence within three business days.
5. Tier I sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, shall report in person to the chief law enforcement official annually in the month of
their birth to verify the information contained in their statement made pursuant to section
589.407. Tier I sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen
years of age or older;
(b) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
and the punishment is less than one year;
(c) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the punishment is less
than a year;
(d) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with sexual motivation;
(e) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130;

HB 2450 41
(f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than one year;
(g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility resident or
vulnerable person;
(h) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public duty
under section 566.145 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(i) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
(j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(k) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037;
(l) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
(m) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section 566.095;
(n) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068 as it existed prior to
January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year; or
(o) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen years
of age;
(2) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of an
offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier I sexual
offenses listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable
to those described as tier I offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
6. Tier II sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, shall report semiannually in person in the month of their birth and six months
thereafter to the chief law enforcement official to verify the information contained in their
statement made pursuant to section 589.407. Tier II sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
sixteen to seventeen years of age;
(b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
between thirteen and fourteen years of age;
(c) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
seventeen years of age;
(d) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
(e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
(f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;

HB 2450 42
(g) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025;
(h) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035;
(i) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 as it existed prior to August 28,
2026, or commercial sexual exploitation under subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of
section 567.016;
(j) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public duty
under section 566.145 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
(k) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
100 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
101 (l) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
102 and the penalty is a term of imprisonment of more than a year; or
103 (m) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under section 566.153;
104 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an offense comparable to a tier I offense listed
105 in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state
106 failure to register offense and who is already required to register as a tier I offender due to
107 having been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
108 (3) Any person who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District
109 of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense
110 of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier II sexual offenses
111 listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to those
112 described as tier II offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
113 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
114 7. Tier III sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of
115 this section, shall report in person to the chief law enforcement official every ninety days to
116 verify the information contained in their statement made under section 589.407. Tier III
117 sexual offenders include:
118 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory sexual offender [as defined in section
119 566.123] or a persistent sexual offender as defined in section [566.124] 566.125;
120 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the crime of:
121 (a) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
122 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
123 (c) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
124 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 if the
125 offense is sexual in nature;
126 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
127 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;

HB 2450 43
128 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064 if the victim is under sixteen years of
129 age;
130 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
131 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the offense is a
132 second or subsequent offense;
133 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is under
134 thirteen years of age;
135 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim is under
136 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian;
137 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
138 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
139 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is greater than a year;
140 (n) Incest under section 568.020;
141 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 with
142 sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with a victim under eighteen years of age;
143 (p) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
144 (q) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
145 (r) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is under
146 thirteen years of age;
147 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 as it existed prior
148 to August 28, 2026, if the victim is under eighteen years of age or commercial sexual
149 exploitation under subdivision (4) or (5) of subsection 1 of section 567.016 if the victim is
150 under eighteen years of age;
151 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 as it existed
152 prior to August 28, 2026, if the victim is under eighteen years of age or commercial sexual
153 exploitation under subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 567.016;
154 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 as it existed
155 prior to August 28, 2026, if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
156 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 as it existed prior to
157 August 28, 2026, if the victim is under eighteen years of age;
158 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
159 victim is under eighteen years of age;
160 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section 566.210;
161 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section 566.211;
162 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;
163 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;

HB 2450 44
164 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
165 under thirteen years of age;
166 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the penalty is a term
167 of imprisonment of more than a year;
168 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 as it existed prior to August 28,
169 2026, if the offender is a persistent offender or commercial sexual exploitation under
170 subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection 1 of section 567.016 if the offender is a persistent
171 offender;
172 (ee) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
173 victim is under thirteen years of age;
174 (ff) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public
175 duty under section 566.145 if the victim is under [thirteen] eighteen years of age;
176 [(gg) Sexual intercourse with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145;
177 (hh)] (gg) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is under
178 thirteen years of age;
179 [(ii)] (hh) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section 573.200; or
180 [(jj)] (ii) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section 573.205;
181 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a crime comparable to a tier I or tier II
182 offense listed in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425, or other
183 comparable out-of-state failure to register offense, who has been or is already required to
184 register as a tier II offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I
185 offenses, or combination of a tier I offense and failure to register offense, on a previous
186 occasion;
187 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of
188 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense of
189 a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier III offense listed in this
190 section or a tier III offense under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
191 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or
192 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in Missouri for any offense of a sexual nature
193 requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is not classified as a tier I or tier
194 II offense in this section.
195 8. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 7 of this section, all Missouri
196 registrants who work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any school whether
197 public or private, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
198 institution of higher education, on a full-time or part-time basis or have a temporary residence
199 in this state shall be required to report in person to the chief law enforcement officer in the
200 area of the state where they work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any

HB 2450 45
201 school or training and register in that state. "Part-time" in this subsection means for more
202 than seven days in any twelve-month period.
203 9. If a person who is required to register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400
204 to 589.425 changes or obtains a new online identifier as defined in section 43.651, the person
205 shall report such information in the same manner as a change of residence before using such
206 online identifier.
595.120. 1. Prior to January 1, 2019, the department of public safety shall create a
poster that provides information regarding the national human trafficking resource center
hotline. The poster shall be no smaller than eight and one-half inches by eleven inches in size
and shall include a statement in substantially the following form:
"If you or someone you know is being forced to engage in any activity
and cannot leave – whether it is commercial sex, housework, farm
work, or any other activity – call the National Human Trafficking
Resource Center Hotline at 1-888-373-7888 or text 233733
(BEFREE) or visit the following website:
www.traffickingresourcecenter.org to access help and services.
Victims of human trafficking are protected under U.S. and Missouri
law.
The toll-free hotline is:
- Available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week
- Operated by a nonprofit, nongovernmental organization
- Anonymous and confidential
- Accessible in 170 languages
- Able to provide help, referral to services, training, and general
information.".

The statement shall appear on each poster in English, Spanish, and, for each county, any other
language required for voting materials in that county under Section 1973 of the Voting Rights
Act of 1965, 42 U.S.C. Section 1973, as amended. In addition to the national human
trafficking resource center hotline, the statement may contain any additional hotlines
regarding human trafficking for access to help and services.
2. Beginning March 1, 2019, the human trafficking hotline poster designed by the
department of public safety shall be displayed in a conspicuous place in or near the bathrooms
or near the entrance of each of the following establishments:
(1) Hotels, motels, or other establishments that have been cited as a public nuisance
for [prostitution] commercial sexual exploitation under section 567.080;
(2) Strip clubs or other sexually oriented businesses;

HB 2450 46
(3) Private clubs that have a liquor permit for on-premises consumption, do not hold
themselves out to be food service establishments, and are not affiliated with any nonprofit
fraternal, athletic, religious, or veteran [organizations] organization;
(4) Airports;
(5) Train stations that serve passengers;
(6) Emergency rooms within general acute care hospitals;
(7) Urgent care centers;
(8) Privately operated job recruitment centers;
(9) Businesses or establishments that offer massage or body work services for
compensation by individuals who are not licensed under section 324.265;
(10) Women's health centers;
(11) Abortion facilities as defined in section 188.015;
(12) Family planning clinics;
(13) Maternity homes as defined in section 135.600;
(14) Pregnancy resource centers as defined in section 135.630;
(15) Bus stations;
(16) Truck stops. For the purposes of this section, "truck stops" shall mean privately
owned and operated facilities that provide food, fuel, shower or other sanitary facilities, and
lawful overnight parking; and
(17) Roadside rest areas.
3. The department of public safety shall make the poster available for print on its
public website. To obtain a copy of the poster, the owners or operators of an establishment
required to post the human trafficking hotline notice under subsection 2 of this section may
print the online poster using the online link or request that the poster be mailed for the cost of
printing and first class postage.
4. Any owner or operator of an establishment required to post the human trafficking
hotline notice under subsection 2 of this section who fails to comply with the requirement
shall receive a written warning for the first violation and may be guilty of an infraction for
any subsequent violation.
610.131. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.140 to the contrary, a
person who at the time of the offense was under the age of eighteen, and has pleaded guilty to
or has been convicted for the offense of prostitution under section 567.020, as it existed prior
to August 28, 2026, may apply to the court in which he or she pled guilty or was sentenced
for an order to expunge from all official records all recordations of his or her arrest, plea, trial,
or conviction. If the court determines that such person was under the age of eighteen or was
acting under the coercion, as defined in section 566.200, of an agent when committing the

HB 2450 47
offense that resulted in a plea of guilty or conviction under section 567.020, as it existed
prior to August 28, 2026, the court shall enter an order of expungement.
2. Upon granting of the order of expungement, the records and files maintained in any
administrative or court proceeding in an associate or circuit division of the circuit court under
this section shall be confidential and only available to the parties or by order of the court for
good cause shown. The effect of such order shall be to restore such person to the status he or
she occupied prior to such arrest, plea, or conviction and as if such event had never taken
place. No person as to whom such order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any
provision of any law to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving a false statement by reason of
his or her failure to recite or acknowledge such arrest, plea, trial, conviction, or expungement
in response to any inquiry made of him or her for any purpose whatsoever and no such
inquiry shall be made for information relating to an expungement under this section.
[567.020. 1. A person commits the offense of prostitution if he or she
engages in or offers or agrees to engage in sexual conduct with another person
in return for something of value to be received by any person.
2. The offense of prostitution is a class B misdemeanor unless the
person knew prior to performing the act of prostitution that he or she was
infected with HIV in which case prostitution is a class B felony. The use of
condoms is not a defense to this offense.
3. As used in this section, "HIV" means the human immunodeficiency
virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
4. The judge may order a drug and alcohol abuse treatment program
for any person found guilty of prostitution, either after trial or upon a plea of
guilty, before sentencing. For the class B misdemeanor offense, upon the
successful completion of such program by the defendant, the court may at its
discretion allow the defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty or reverse the
verdict and enter a judgment of not guilty. For the class B felony offense, the
court shall not allow the defendant to withdraw the plea of guilty or reverse the
verdict and enter a judgment of not guilty. The judge, however, has discretion
to take into consideration successful completion of a drug or alcohol treatment
program in determining the defendant's sentence.
5. A person shall not be certified as an adult or adjudicated as a
delinquent for the offense of prostitution under this section if the person was
under the age of eighteen at the time the offense occurred. In such cases where
the person was under the age of eighteen, the person shall be classified as a
victim of abuse, as defined under section 210.110, and such abuse shall be
reported immediately to the children's division, as required under section
210.115 and to the juvenile officer for appropriate services, treatment,
investigation, and other proceedings as provided under chapters 207, 210, and
211. Upon request, the local law enforcement agency and the prosecuting
attorney shall assist the children's division and the juvenile officer in
conducting the investigation.]

HB 2450 48
[567.030. 1. A person commits the offense of patronizing prostitution
if he or she:
(1) Pursuant to a prior understanding, gives something of value to
another person as compensation for having engaged in sexual conduct with
any person; or
(2) Gives or agrees to give something of value to another person with
the understanding that such person or another person will engage in sexual
conduct with any person; or
(3) Solicits or requests another person to engage in sexual conduct
with any person in return for something of value.
2. It shall not be a defense that the person believed that the individual
he or she patronized for prostitution was eighteen years of age or older.
3. The offense of patronizing prostitution is a class B misdemeanor,
unless the individual who the person patronizes is less than eighteen years of
age but older than fifteen years of age, in which case patronizing prostitution is
a class E felony.
4. The offense of patronizing prostitution is a class B felony if the
individual who the person patronizes is fifteen years of age or younger.
Nothing in this section shall preclude the prosecution of an individual for the
offenses of:
(1) Statutory rape in the first degree pursuant to section 566.032;
(2) Statutory rape in the second degree pursuant to section 566.034;
(3) Statutory sodomy in the first degree pursuant to section 566.062; or
(4) Statutory sodomy in the second degree pursuant to section
566.064.]
[567.050. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution
in the first degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Promotes prostitution by compelling a person to enter into, engage
in, or remain in prostitution;
(2) Promotes prostitution of a person less than sixteen years of age; or
(3) Owns, manages, or operates an interactive computer service, or
conspires or attempts to do so, with the intent to promote or facilitate the
prostitution of another. As used in this subdivision, the term "interactive
computer service" shall mean any information service, system, or access
software provider that provides or enables computer access by multiple users
to a computer server, including specifically a service or system that provides
access to the internet and such systems operated or services offered by libraries
or educational institutions.
2. The term "compelling" includes:
(1) The use of forcible compulsion;
(2) The use of a drug or intoxicating substance to render a person
incapable of controlling his conduct or appreciating its nature;
(3) Withholding or threatening to withhold dangerous drugs or a
narcotic from a drug dependent person.
3. (1) The offense of promoting prostitution in the first degree under
subdivision (1) or (3) of subsection 1 of this section is a class B felony.

HB 2450 49
(2) The offense of promoting prostitution in the first degree under
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section is a class A felony if a person
acts in reckless disregard of the fact that such conduct contributed to the
offense of trafficking for the purposes of sexual exploitation under section
566.209.
(3) The offense of promoting prostitution in the first degree under
subdivision (2) of subsection 1 of this section is a felony punishable by a term
of imprisonment not less than ten years and not to exceed fifteen years.
4. A person injured by the acts committed in violation of subdivision
(3) of subsection 1 of this section or subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this
section shall have a civil cause of action to recover damages and reasonable
attorneys' fees for such injury.
5. In addition to the court's authority to order a defendant to make
restitution for the damage or loss caused by his or her offense as provided in
section 559.105, the court shall enter a judgment of restitution against the
defendant convicted of violating subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of this section
and subdivision (2) of subsection 3 of this section.]
[567.060. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution
in the second degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Promotes prostitution by managing, supervising, controlling or
owning, either alone or in association with others, a house of prostitution or a
prostitution business or enterprise involving prostitution activity by two or
more prostitutes; or
(2) Promotes prostitution of a person sixteen or seventeen years of age.
2. The offense of promoting prostitution in the second degree is a class
D felony.]
[567.070. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting prostitution
in the third degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Causes or aids a person to commit or engage in prostitution;
(2) Procures or solicits patrons for prostitution;
(3) Provides persons or premises for prostitution purposes;
(4) Operates or assists in the operation of a house of prostitution or a
prostitution business or enterprise;
(5) Accepts or receives or agrees to accept or receive something of
value pursuant to an agreement or understanding with any person whereby he
or she participates or is to participate in proceeds of prostitution activity; or
(6) Engages in any conduct designed to institute, aid or facilitate an act
or enterprise of prostitution.
2. The offense of promoting prostitution in the third degree is a class E
felony.]
[567.085. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting travel for
prostitution if he or she knowingly sells or offers to sell travel services that
include or facilitate travel for the purpose of engaging in prostitution as
defined by section 567.020.
2. The offense of promoting travel for prostitution is a class D felony.]

HB 2450 50
[567.087. 1. No travel agency or charter tour operator shall:
(1) Promote travel for prostitution as described in section 567.085;
(2) Sell, advertise, or otherwise offer to sell travel services or facilitate
travel:
(a) For the purpose of engaging in a commercial sex act as defined in
section 566.010;
(b) That consists of tourism packages or activities using and offering
any sexual contact as defined in section 566.010 as enticement for tourism; or
(c) That provides or purports to provide access to or that facilitates the
availability of sex escorts or sexual services.
2. There shall be a rebuttable presumption that any travel agency or
charter tour operator using advertisements that include the term "sex tours" or
"sex travel" or include depictions of human genitalia is in violation of this
section.]
[567.089. 1. No travel agency or charter tour operator shall engage in
selling, advertising, or otherwise offering to sell travel services, tourism
packages, or activities that solicit, encourage, or facilitate travel for the
purpose of engaging in prostitution.
2. Upon violation of this section by a travel agency or charter tour
operator, the secretary of state shall revoke the articles of incorporation of the
travel agency or charter tour operator. The secretary of state, as part of a
proceeding brought under this section, may order a freeze of the bank or
deposit accounts of the travel agency or charter tour operator.]
[567.090. The general assembly by enacting this chapter intends to
preempt any other regulation of the area covered by felony sections 567.050
through 567.070 , to promote statewide control of prostitution, and to
standardize laws that governmental subdivisions may adopt in other areas
covered by this chapter. No governmental subdivision may enact or enforce a
law that makes any conduct in the area covered by sections 567.050 through
567.070 subject to a criminal or civil penalty or sanction of any kind. Cities
and towns may enact and enforce laws prohibiting and penalizing conduct
subject to criminal or civil penalties or sanctions under other provisions of this
chapter, but the provisions of such laws shall be the same and the authorized
penalties or sanctions under such laws shall not be greater than those of this
chapter. Cities and towns may also enact and enforce laws prohibiting and
penalizing public solicitation of sexual conduct, whether or not the offer to
engage in sexual conduct is in return for something of value, and health laws
to prevent the spread of venereal diseases.]
[567.100. In addition to the responsibility of circuit attorneys and
prosecuting attorneys in their respective jurisdictions to enforce the criminal
provisions of this chapter, they shall have the duty to enforce the provisions of
section 567.080; and the attorney general shall have a concurrent duty to
enforce the civil provisions of section 567.080.]

HB 2450 51
[567.110. Any person who has been found guilty of a violation of
section 567.020 or 567.030 and who is alleged and proved to be a persistent
prostitution offender is guilty of a class E felony.]
[567.120. Any person arrested for a prostitution-related offense, who
has been found guilty of a prior prostitution-related offense, may, within the
sound discretion of the court, be required to undergo HIV testing as a
condition precedent to the issuance of bond for the offense.]
✔